Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB667.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 109.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "confidential business information" means the following
information relating to[ privately] contracted solid waste management services[ that
are not being provided pursuant to a franchise agreement]:
(a) Commercial or residential customer service prices;[ or]
(b) Commercial or residential customer lists; and
(c) Any other proprietary or sensitive business information of a service
company or its customers.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, unless by order of a court of
competent jurisdiction, a county or waste management district, or any of its agents,
officials,[ or] employees, contractors, consultants, or other persons acting on its
behalf or for its benefit, shall not compel the production or submission of, or
otherwise request, acquire, receive, review, or possess confidential business
information from a service company or its customers by any means, including but
not limited to requests made to other public agencies that may cause the release
of confidential business information[to any county or waste management district].
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, confidential business
information shall be exempt from disclosure under the requirements of KRS
61.870 to 61.884.
(4) If any confidential business information is obtained in violation of this section,
the county or waste management district shall:
(a) Immediately secure the information to prevent further access or
dissemination;
(b) Require the return or certified destruction of the confidential business
information; and
Page 1 of 2
BR212300.100 - 2123 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2123
(c) Document all corrective action taken.
(5) This section shall not prohibit payment for work that a contractor can
demonstrate is uninfluenced by and independent from confidential business
information.
Page 2 of 2
BR212300.100 - 2123 - XXXX 3/9/2026 5:11 PM Jacketed